Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1156.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; state detention centers The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety to reimburse cities, towns and counties in this state for costs associated with short-term detention holds for unauthorized aliens.